BrailleTables/en-us-g2.ctb
always [ 456-12356
always ] 456-23456

always { 46-12356
always } 46-23456

always # 3456

midnum * 4-16
always * 35-35
repeatable *** 16-16-16

midnum / 34
always / 456-34

always % 4-356

always & 456-12346

always @ 4-1

always \\ 456-16

always | 456-1256

repeatable \s 0
repeatable \t 0
repeatable \xa0 0 no break space

always -com =
repeatable --- 36-36-36
always \s-\s 36-36
always \s-\scom 36-36-14-135-134

always _ 78
repeatable ___ 78-78-78

repeatable === 46-13-46-13-46-13

# the hyphen
always ­ 36
repeatable ­­­ 36-36-36
always \s­\s 36-36

# accented letters
always À 6-4-1      [C0] upper a grave
always Á 6-4-1      [C1] upper a acute
always Â 6-4-1      [C2] upper a circumflex
always Ã 6-4-1      [C3] upper a tilde
always Ä 6-4-1      [C4] upper a dieresis
always Å 6-4-1      [C5] upper a ring
always Æ 6-1-15     [C6] upper ae
always Ç 6-4-14     [C7] upper c cedilla
always È 6-4-15     [C8] upper e grave
always É 6-4-15     [C9] upper e acute
always Ê 6-4-15     [CA] upper e circumflex
always Ë 6-4-15     [CB] upper e dieresis
always Ì 6-4-24     [CC] upper i grave
always Í 6-4-24     [CD] upper i acute
always Î 6-4-24     [CE] upper i circumflex
always Ï 6-4-24     [CF] upper i dieresis
always Ð 6-4-15     [D0] upper eth
always Ñ 6-4-1345   [D1] upper n tilde
always Ò 6-4-135    [D2] upper o grave
always Ó 6-4-135    [D3] upper o acute
always Ô 6-4-135    [D4] upper o circumflex
always Õ 6-4-135    [D5] upper o tilde
always Ö 6-4-135    [D6] upper o dieresis
always Ø 6-4-135    [D8] upper o slash
always Ù 6-4-136    [D9] upper u grave
always Ú 6-4-136    [DA] upper u acute
always Û 6-4-136    [DB] upper u circumflex
always Ü 6-4-136    [DC] upper u dieresis
always Ý 6-4-13456  [DD] upper y acute
always Þ 6-4-2345   [DE] upper t horn
always ß 234-234    [DF] lower ss
always à   4-1      [E0] lower a grave
always á   4-1      [E1] lower a acute
always â   4-1      [E2] lower a circumflex
always ã   4-1      [E3] lower a tilde
always ä   4-1      [E4] lower a dieresis
always å   4-1      [E5] lower a ring
always æ   1-15     [E6] lower ae
always ç   4-14     [E7] lower c cedilla
always è   4-15     [E8] lower e grave
always é   4-15     [E9] lower e acute
always ê   4-15     [EA] lower e circumflex
always ë   4-15     [EB] lower e dieresis
always ì   4-24     [EC] lower i grave
always í   4-24     [ED] lower i acute
always î   4-24     [EE] lower i circumflex
always ï   4-24     [EF] lower i dieresis
always ð   4-15     [F0] lower eth
always ñ   4-1345   [F1] lower n tilde
always ò   4-135    [F2] lower o grave
always ó   4-135    [F3] lower o acute
always ô   4-135    [F4] lower o circumflex
always õ   4-135    [F5] lower o tilde
always ö   4-135    [F6] lower o dieresis
always ø   4-135    [F8] lower o slash
always ù   4-136    [F9] lower u grave
always ú   4-136    [FA] lower u acute
always û   4-136    [FB] lower u circumflex
always ü   4-136    [FC] lower u dieresis
always ý   4-13456  [FD] lower y acute
always þ   4-2345   [FE] lower t horn
always ÿ   4-13456  [FF] lower y dieresis

# mathematical symbols
always < 5-13
always = 46-13
always > 46-2
midnum + 346
always + 346
midnum - 36
always - 36
always × 46-16 multiplication sign
midnum ÷ 46-34 division sign
begnum $ 256
always $ 256-3456

# other special characters
always © 2356-6-14-2356 copyright
always ¶ 4-1234-345 paragraph
always § 4-234-3 section
always ° 45-46-16 degrees
always ¢ 4-14 cents
always £ 4-123 pounds
always ¥ 4-13456 yen
always µ 46-134 mu

# abbreviations
word aarp = American Association of Retired Persons

# special character sequences
literal :// URLs
literal www.

literal .com
literal .edu
literal .gov
literal .mil
literal .net
literal .org
include countries.cti

literal .doc
literal .htm
literal .html
literal .tex
literal .txt

literal .gif
literal .jpg
literal .png
literal .wav

literal .tar
literal .zip

# d,g,r,rs,s,st,th conceive deceive declare perceive receive rejoice
# n't could must should would

# When an upper-case letter occurs inside a contraction, following a lower-case
# letter, the contraction should not be used. Example McCan

# Windows mail programs use all sorts of weird characters for apostrophes. 
# I would prefer to have all characters above 126 just show up as a 
# backslash and two hex digits.

# problems with quotation marks before and after dashes: "division"--a

# when a decimal begins with a period, it should be translated with a 
# number sign followed by a decimal point, followed by the number.
